California, session 20252026, SB671.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21450.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21450.5. (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following definitions:(1) “Accessible pedestrian signal” or “APS” means an integrated device that communicates information about the “WALK” and “DON’T WALK” intervals at signalized intersections in nonvisual formats, including audible tones, speech messages, and vibrotactile surfaces, to pedestrians who are blind or have low vision.(2) “Leading pedestrian interval” or “LPI” means an official traffic control signal that advances the “WALK” signal for three to seven seconds while the red signal halting traffic continues to be displayed on parallel through or turning traffic.(3) “Pedestrian hybrid beacon” means a special type of hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an unsignalized location to assist pedestrians in crossing a street or highway at a marked crosswalk. Following an actuation by a pedestrian, a pedestrian hybrid beacon face shall display to motorists and bicyclists a flashing CIRCULAR YELLOW signal indication, followed by a steady CIRCULAR YELLOW signal indication, followed by both steady CIRCULAR RED signal indications during the pedestrian walk interval and followed by alternating flashing CIRCULAR RED signal indications during the pedestrian change interval. Upon termination of the pedestrian change interval, the pedestrian hybrid beacon faces shall revert to a dark, not illuminated, condition. When a pedestrian makes an actuation, they shall wait for a “WALK” signal to appear on the pedestrian head in order to proceed. After the countdown, a “DON’T WALK” signal appears, and the pedestrian hybrid beacon has to be activated again to initiate a “WALK” signal.(4) “Replaced” or “replacement” means the relocation or exchange in place of all existing signal poles at an intersection with new signal poles.(5) A “traffic-actuated signal” is an official traffic control signal, as specified in Section 445, that displays one or more of its indications in response to the presence of traffic detected by mechanical, visual, electrical, or other means.(6) “Caltrans” means the Department of Transportation.(b) Upon the first placement of a traffic-actuated signal or replacement of the loop detector of a traffic-actuated signal, the traffic-actuated signal shall, to the extent feasible and in conformance with professional traffic engineering practice, be installed and maintained to detect lawful bicycle or motorcycle traffic on the roadway.(c) Cities, counties, and cities and counties shall not be required to comply with the provisions contained in subdivision (b) until the Department of Transportation, in consultation with these entities, has established uniform standards, specifications, and guidelines for the detection of bicycles and motorcycles by traffic-actuated signals and related signal timing.(d) (1) At crosswalks with state-owned or -operated traffic-actuated signals and pedestrian hybrid beacons with pedestrian signal heads, the walk indication and other visual signals, including, but not limited to, LPIs and countdown pedestrian signals, shall comply with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (CA MUTCD), 4E.11. These pedestrian signal heads shall have an APS pushbutton or touch-free APS that activates “WALK” and “DON’T WALK” intervals and other visual signals at signalized intersections in nonvisual formats, including, but not limited to, audible tones, speech messages, and vibrotactile surfaces. These features shall be activated, maintained, and available at all times of the day.(2) (A) Touch-free APS shall be installed at new signalized pedestrian crossings on capital projects on the state highway system, defined in Section 300 of the Streets and Highways Code, encroachment permit projects, and highway maintenance-funded projects according to the following schedule:(i) Capital outlay support projects that have a ready to list date.(ii) Capital outlay support projects that are in construction before October 18, 2021.(iii) Encroachment permit projects that have been approved on or after October 18, 2021.(iv) Highway maintenance-funded projects that have a ready to list date on or after October 18, 2021.(B) (i) When a touch-free APS is installed at an existing signalized pedestrian crossing, or in response to a federal Americans with Disability Act (ADA) access request, on capital projects on the state highway system, all APS at that location shall be upgraded to touch-free APS.(ii) The installation of touch-free APS shall not require the upgrading of other ADA components, including, but not limited to, curb ramps or sidewalks, unless those components are disturbed.(3) When performing maintenance and repair activities on capital projects on the state highway system, as defined in Section 300 of the Streets and Highways Code, encroachment permit projects, and highway maintenance-funded projects, the maintenance and repair shall consider using touch-free APS.(4) Unsignalized pedestrian crossings at signalized intersections, including, but not limited to, intersections with free-right turns, may remain unsignalized.(e) (1) Upon the first placement or replacement of a state-owned or -operated traffic-actuated signal, the traffic-actuated signal shall be installed and maintained to have an LPI and a touch-free APS, in compliance with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (CA MUTCD). The touch-free APS shall be activated.(2) Caltrans shall implement LPIs on existing state-owned or -operated traffic-actuated signals capable of being implemented with remote installation or in-person programming when maintenance work is done on the intersection in which the traffic-actuated signal is located, if the traffic-actuated signal is in any of the following areas, unless prohibited by the CA MUTCD:(A) A residential district, as determined by Section 22507.5.(B) A business district, as defined in Sections 235 and 240.(C) A business activity district, as defined in Section 22358.9.(D) A safety corridor, as defined in Section 2B.13 of the CA MUTCD.(E) A school zone, as defined in Section 1A.13.185 of the CA MUTCD.(F) Areas with a high concentration of pedestrians and cyclists, as defined in Section 2B.13 and Table 2B.106(CA) of the CA MUTCD.(3) (A) As soon as practicable, all existing state-owned or -operated traffic signals located in the areas described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2) shall be identified and recorded in the Caltrans Management System (TMS) inventory database to assist future annual operational review requirements and coordination with local agencies for delegated signals. LPIs shall be implemented at these existing state-owned or -operated traffic signal locations at the next opportunity for regularly scheduled operational reviews. Traffic signals that have been implemented with LPIs shall be recorded in the TMS inventory database.(B) As soon as practicable, Caltrans’ district signal operations units shall formally notify, in writing, local agencies operating state-owned traffic-actuated signals in areas described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2), about the opportunity to implement LPI on the signals. Additionally, these local agencies shall report their implementation of LPIs at these locations to Caltrans so the locations can be included in the TMS inventory database.(C) For existing traffic signals not in areas described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2), Caltrans shall follow the same criteria for implementing LPIs in paragraph (2).(4) Depending on the physical location and traffic conditions, locations where LPIs have been implemented pursuant to this subdivision may restrict turns on red using illuminated blank out signs and enhanced signing. LPIs are to be implemented at existing signals with touch-free APS and pedestrian countdown signals.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.